Utah statutes.
63G-6a-903.   Determination of nonresponsibility of bidder or offeror.

(1)  A determination of nonresponsibility of a bidder or offeror made by an issuing procurement unit shall be made in writing, in accordance with the rules of the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  The unreasonable failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly supply information in connection with an inquiry with respect to responsibility may be grounds for a determination of nonresponsibility with respect to the bidder or offeror.

(3)  Subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, information furnished by a bidder or offeror pursuant to this section may not be disclosed outside of a procurement unit without prior written consent by the bidder or offeror.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

